Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 299A.465, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin Covered individualnew text end disabled in line of duty. (a) This subdivision applies to any deleted text begin peace officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end : (1) who the Public Employees Retirement Association or the Minnesota State Retirement System determines is eligible to receive a duty disability benefit pursuant to section 353.656 or 352B.10, subdivision 1, respectively; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) who is a member of a local police or salaried firefighters relief association and qualifies for a duty disability benefit under the terms of plans of the relief associations, and the peace officer or firefighter has discontinued public service as a peace officer or firefighter as a result of a disabling injury and has been determined, by the Public Employees Retirement Association, to have otherwise met the duty disability criteria set forth in section 353.01, subdivision 41new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) who is described in section 353.64, subdivision 10, and is eligible to receive a duty disability benefit under section 353.656new text end . (b) Determinations made in accordance with paragraph (a) are binding on the deleted text begin peace officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end , employer, and state. The determination must be made by the executive director of the Public Employees Retirement Association or by the executive director of the Minnesota State Retirement System, whichever applies, and is not subject to section 356.96, subdivision 2. Upon making a determination, the executive director must provide written notice to the deleted text begin peace officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end and the employer. The notice must include a written statement of the reasons for the determination. If the notice is from the executive director of the Minnesota State Retirement System, the notice must also include: (1) a notice that the person may petition for a review of the determination by requesting that a contested case be initiated before the Office of Administrative Hearings, the cost of which must be borne by the peace officer or firefighter and the employer; and (2) a statement that any person who does not petition for a review within 60 days is precluded from contesting issues determined by the executive director in any other administrative review or court procedure. If, prior to the contested case hearing, additional information is provided to support the claim for duty disability as defined in section 352B.011, subdivision 7, the executive director may reverse the determination without the requested hearing. If a hearing is held before the Office of Administrative Hearings, the determination rendered by the judge conducting the fact-finding hearing is a final decision and order under section 14.62, subdivision 2a, and is binding on the applicable executive director, the peace officer or firefighter, employer, and state. Review of a final determination made by the Office of Administrative Hearings under this section may only be obtained by writ of certiorari to the Minnesota Court of Appeals under sections 14.63 to 14.68. Only the peace officer or firefighter, employer, and state have standing to participate in a judicial review of the decision of the Office of Administrative Hearings. (c) The deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end employer must continue to provide health coverage and pay for the coverage as required by paragraphs (d) to (g) for: (1) the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end ; and (2) the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end dependents if the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end was receiving dependent coverage at the time of the injury under the employer's group health plan. (d) For deleted text begin an officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin a covered individualnew text end who has applied for or been approved to receive benefits under section 353.656 prior to the date of enactment or deleted text begin an officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin a covered individualnew text end who applies for and is approved for total and permanent duty disability benefits under section 353.656, subdivision 1a, the employer is responsible for the continued payment of the employer's contribution for health coverage of the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end and, if applicable, the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end dependents. Coverage must continue for the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end and, if applicable, the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end dependents until the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end reaches age 65 or, if deceased, would have reached age 65. (e) For deleted text begin an officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin a covered individualnew text end approved to receive benefits under section 353.656 on or after the date of enactment and who is not approved for total and permanent duty disability benefits under section 353.656, subdivision 1a, the employer is responsible for the continued payment of the employer's contribution for health coverage of the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end and, if applicable, the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end dependents. Coverage must continue: (1) for the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end for a period of 60 months or, if earlier, until the deleted text begin officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin covered individualnew text end reaches age 65; and (2) for the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end dependents for a period of 60 months. (f) For an officer or firefighter who has applied for or been approved to receive benefits under section 352B.10, subdivision 1, the employer is responsible for the continued payment of the employer's contribution for health coverage of the officer or firefighter and, if applicable, the officer's or firefighter's dependents. Coverage must continue for the officer or firefighter and, if applicable, the officer's or firefighter's dependents until the officer or firefighter reaches age 65 or, if deceased, would have reached age 65. (g) The employer is not required to continue health coverage for dependents after the person is no longer a dependent. (h) deleted text begin An officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin A covered individualnew text end who has applied for or been approved to receive benefits under section 353.656 may affirmatively waive health coverage under this section but must not receive any payment or other consideration from the employer in exchange for waiver of the coverage. Any agreement entered into between deleted text begin an officer or firefighterdeleted text end new text begin a covered individualnew text end who has applied for or been approved to receive benefits under section 353.656 and the deleted text begin officer's or firefighter'sdeleted text end new text begin covered individual'snew text end employer or the employer's agent providing for compensation for a waiver of coverage under this section is void. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to render void any agreement entered into prior to the date of enactment. (i) Once a duty disability determination is made pursuant to section 353.656, the employer has no right to challenge and is prohibited from challenging the continuation and payment of health coverage under this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.465, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Definition. For purposes of this section: (a) "Peace officer" or "officer" has the meaning given in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). (b) "Dependent" means a person who: (1) meets the definition of dependent in section 62L.02, subdivision 11, at the time of the officer'snew text begin , paramedic's, emergency medical technician's,new text end or firefighter's injury or death, or at the time of the volunteer firefighter's death; and (2) is not covered under another group health plan. For purposes of this section, the term "eligible employee" as defined under section 62L.02, subdivision 13, includes a volunteer firefighter. (c) "Firefighter" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes 2000, section 424.03, but does not include volunteer firefighters. (d) "Volunteer firefighter" has the meaning given in section 299N.03, subdivision 7, and includes paid per call. (e) "Fire department" has the meaning given in section 299N.03, subdivision 4. (f) For purposes of subdivisions 2 to 5a, "employer" includes a municipality or municipalities that operate the fire department in which a volunteer firefighter serves. new text begin (g) "Covered individual" includes a peace officer, firefighter, volunteer firefighter, paramedic, and emergency medical technician eligible for benefits under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPLICATION.new text end new text begin The amendments in sections 1 and 2 apply to injuries occurring on or after January 1, 2020. new text end